Washington statutes.
RCW 19.150.090

Claim by persons with a security interest.

Any person who has a perfected security interest under *Article 62A.9 RCW of the uniform commercial code may claim any personal property subject to the security interest and subject to a lien pursuant to this chapter by paying the total amount due, as specified in the lien notices, for the storage of the property. Upon payment of the total amount due, the owner shall deliver possession of the particular property subject to the security interest to the person who paid the total amount due. The owner shall not be liable to any person for any action taken pursuant to this section if the owner has fully complied with RCW 19.150.050 and 19.150.060.

[ 1988 c 240 s 10.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Article 62A.9 RCW was repealed in its entirety by 2000 c 250 s 9A-901, effective July 1, 2001. For later enactment, see Article 62A.9A RCW.